Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-532
Traps; requirements; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to set any trap in this state unless the trap is marked in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. Violation of this section shall be a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-511.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 252.